Hawaii statutes.
§128A-5 County organizations for homeland
security. Counties are authorized, but not required, to establish
organizations for homeland security. If a county does not establish a separate
organization for homeland security, the functions listed in section 128A-4
shall be incorporated into the responsibilities of the county emergency
management agency. [L 2013, c 175, pt of §2; am L 2015, c 35, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next